Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-6508
Equivalent employees, defined.

Equivalent employees means the number of employees computed by dividing the total hours paid in a year by the product of forty times the number of weeks in a year. A salaried employee who receives a predetermined amount of compensation each pay period on a weekly or less frequent basis is deemed to have been paid for forty hours per week during the pay period.

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 51.